Utah statutes.
77-17-7.   Conviction on testimony of accomplice -- Instruction to jury.
(1) A conviction may be had on the uncorroborated testimony of an accomplice.
(2)  In the discretion of the court, an instruction to the jury may be given
to the effect that such uncorroborated testimony should be viewed with
caution, and such an instruction shall be given if the trial judge finds the
testimony of the accomplice to be self contradictory, uncertain or improbable.
